Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-526
Motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel; unlawful transportation; vehicle declared nuisance.

Any car, automobile, truck, pipeline, airplane, vehicle, or means of transportation which is engaged in or used for the unlawful transportation of motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel is declared a common nuisance, and there shall be no property rights of any kind whatsoever in any car, automobile, truck, pipeline, airplane, vehicle, or other means of transportation which is engaged in or used for the unlawful transportation of motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel except as provided in sections 66-527 to 66-531.

Laws 1933, c. 47, § 2, p. 258;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-423;

R.S.1943, § 66-433;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-433;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 29;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 66-4,107;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 88.